Tennessee, session 114, HB0087.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-907, is amended by deleting the
first sentence of the section and substituting instead the following:
The department of education shall submit an early grades reading report to the
education committee of the senate and the education committees of the house of
representatives no later than October 15 of each year.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0087
000391
- 1 -